test/src/morphology/N-njuunnjel_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - njuuˊnnjel e-stem pöly: # Noun "Smew/uivelo"- full paradigm
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Sg+Nom: njuuˊnnjel
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Sg+Gen: njuˊnnjel
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Sg+Acc: njuˊnnjel
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Sg+Ill: njuˊnnjla
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Sg+Loc: njuˊnnjlest
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Sg+Com: njuˊnnjlin
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Ess: njuˊnnjlen
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Par: njuˊnnjled
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Sg+Abe: njuˊnnjeltää
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Pl+Nom: njuˊnnjel
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Pl+Gen: njuˊnnjli
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Pl+Acc: njuˊnnjlid
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Pl+Ill: njuˊnnjlid
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Pl+Loc: njuˊnnjlin
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Pl+Com: njuˊnnjlivuiˊm
     njuuˊnnjel+A+Pl+Abe: njuˊnnjlitää
